North Dakota statutes. TITLE 4 Agriculture
CHAPTER 4-40 Crop Protection Products [Repealed]

4-40-01.
Crop protection products — Canadian labels. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 64, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-40-02.
Special local needs exemption — Tolerances. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 64, § 2; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-40-03.
Crop protection products — Registration process — Joint labeling. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 64, § 3; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-40-04.
Crop protection products — Request to petition for registration. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 64, § 4; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.